Rhode Island statutes. Title 40.1 Behavioral Healthcare, Developmental Disabilities and Hospitals
Chapter 24.5 Community Residences

40.1-24.5-1.
Definitions.

Whenever used in this chapter, or in any order, rule, or regulation made or promulgated pursuant to this chapter or in any printed forms prepared by the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals in furtherance of this chapter, unless otherwise expressly stated, or unless the context or subject matter otherwise requires:

“Community residence” means a place, such as a group home, however named, licensed pursuant to chapter 24 of this title for the purpose of providing rehabilitation, psychological support, skills training, social guidance, and living accommodations to individuals who are mentally disabled, as defined by §

40.1-5-2

; provided, however, that this definition shall not be deemed to include places, however named, for persons who are mentally retarded, alcoholics, or drug abusers.

“Director” means the head or the chief administrative officer of the community residence, or his or her designee.

“Grievance procedure” means the formalized process mandated by §

40.1-24.5-8

to enable residents to register alleged violations of the resident’s rights assured by §§

40.1-24.5-5

and

40.1-24.5-6

.

“Individualized service plan” means the document that sets forth specific services, such as vocational, social, medical, psychiatric, and rehabilitative, that are structured to accomplish and express short- and long-term goals and objectives responsive to the individual needs of the resident.

“Mental health advocate” means and refers to the individual appointed by the governor with the advice and consent of the senate in accordance with §

40.1-5-14

and to his or her duly appointed assistants.

“Person” means any individual, partnership, corporation, company, or association and the legal successors in interest thereof.

“Resident” means an individual of lawful age admitted to a community residence.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 363, § 1.

40.1-24.5-2.
General powers and duties of the director of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals.

The director of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals is charged with the execution of the laws relating to the admission and the care of the mentally disabled with respect to this chapter, and is hereby authorized and empowered to do all acts necessary and proper to ensure the comfort and welfare of residents and to protect residents’ rights.

The director of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals, or one or more of his or her assistants or representatives so designated, may:

Examine all community residences; and

Inquire into their methods of government and the management of all persons therein; and

Examine into the condition of all buildings, grounds, and other property connected with a community residence and into all matters relating to its management.

The director of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations governing the management of community residences as he or she may deem necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 363, § 1.

40.1-24.5-3.
Legal rights and competence of persons admitted — Informing person as to rights, obligations, and grievance procedures.

Continuation of rights, responsibilities, and obligations. No resident, as a consequence of admission to a community residence and of receiving an evaluation of mental disability, shall lose any legal rights, responsibility, or obligation, or suffer any legal disability as a citizen, unless otherwise prescribed by law. Among others, no resident shall be presumed to be incompetent to manage his or her affairs, to contract, to hold or seek a professional, occupational, or vehicle operator’s license, to make a will, to marry, or for any other purpose, unless otherwise prescribed by law. Neither shall any requirement be made, by rule, regulation, or otherwise, as a condition to admission and retention, that any individual applying for admission shall have the legal capacity to contract, it being sufficient for such purpose, that the individual understand the nature and consequence of making the application.

Admission; requirements; duties of residence staff.

As part of the procedure for the admission of an individual to a community residence, each prospective resident shall be fully informed of all rules, regulations, and policies governing resident conduct and responsibilities, including grounds for dismissal and procedures for discharge. A written application acknowledging the disclosure shall be signed by the prospective resident in the presence of at least one witness, who shall attest to the application by placing his or her name and address thereon.

Further, at the time of admission, each resident shall be fully informed of residents’ rights and a written copy of the residents’ rights shall be given to each resident who shall acknowledge receipt of the written copy by his or her signature upon the copy. This written copy of residents’ rights shall include the working hours, address, and telephone number of the mental health advocate.

Further, at the time of admission, each resident shall be fully informed, orally and in writing, of the grievance procedure established within the community residence.

Further, at the time of admission, each resident shall be informed, in writing, of all anticipated financial charges, including all costs not covered either under federal and/or state programs, by other third payers by the community residence’s basic per-diem rate.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 363, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 141.

40.1-24.5-4.
[Reserved.]

40.1-24.5-5.
Absolute rights of residents.

No resident admitted to any community residence shall be deprived of any constitutional, civil, or legal right, solely by reason of admission. Among others, each resident shall be entitled to the following rights without limitation:

To privacy and dignity;

To civil service or merit rating or ranking and appointment;

Those relating to the granting, forfeiture, or denial of a license, permit privilege, or benefit pursuant to any law;

To attend or not attend religious services;

To be visited privately at all reasonable times by one’s personal physician, attorney, clergyperson, and the mental health advocate;

To vote and participate in political activity, including reasonable assistance when desired in registering and voting;

To be employed at a gainful occupation insofar as the resident’s condition permits. No resident shall be required to perform labor that involves the essential operation and maintenance of the community residence or program or the regular supervision or care of other residents. Residents may be required to perform labor involving normal housekeeping and home-maintenance functions as documented in their individualized service plan or as delineated in the community residents rules and regulations;

To communicate by sealed mail or otherwise with persons of one’s choosing;

To participate in the development of individualized service plan;

To have access to his or her individualized service plan and other medical, social, financial, vocational, psychiatric, or other information included in the resident’s file maintained by the community residence;

To not be the subject to experimental research without his or her prior written and informed consent;

To be free from verbal and physical abuse;

To register an alleged violation of resident’s rights through the established grievance procedure as delineated in §

40.1-24.5-8

; and

To have access to the mental health advocate upon request and to have assistance when desired and necessary to implement this right.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 363, § 1.

40.1-24.5-6.
Qualified rights of residents.

Except to the extent that the director as defined in §

40.1-24.5-1

determines that a limitation or a denial of one of the following rights would be in the resident’s best interests and, further, unless the director documents the good-cause reasons for the denial or limitations in the resident’s individualized service plan, the resident shall be entitled to the following:

To wear one’s own clothes and to keep and use one’s own personal possessions;

To keep and be allowed to spend a reasonable sum of one’s own money for consumer purchases;

To have reasonable access to a telephone to make and receive confidential calls;

To have opportunities for physical exercise and outdoor recreation;

To have reasonable, prompt access to current newspapers, magazines, and radio and television programming; and

To receive visitors of one’s own choosing at all reasonable times. Posted reasonable visiting hours must be maintained in each community residence, with a minimum of six (6) hours daily.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 363, § 1.

40.1-24.5-7.
Posting of residents’ rights.

A copy of the residents’ rights set forth in §§

40.1-24.5-5

and

40.1-24.5-6

shall be conspicuously posted in community residences at all times.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 363, § 1.

40.1-24.5-8.
Resident grievance procedure.

A community residence shall have a written grievance procedure in order to resolve allegations of violations of the rights assured in this chapter. The grievance procedure shall be conspicuously posted in residential and activity areas, along with the name and telephone number of the mental health advocate.

The resident shall be entitled to initiate a grievance at all times, and to this end, grievance forms shall be made available at all times. It shall be the duty of the community residence staff to encourage and assist the resident in exercising his or her rights under this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 363, § 1.

40.1-24.5-9.
Notification of mental health advocate as to alleged violation of rights.

The director will immediately notify the mental health advocate when a violation of absolute rights under §

40.1-24.5-5

is alleged. Subsequent to oral notification, the director will send to the mental health advocate a copy of the grievance form.

The director will notify the mental health advocate when a violation of qualified rights under §

40.1-24.5-6

is alleged by sending to the advocate a copy of the grievance form.

The director will send to the mental health advocate a copy of all written resolutions for all grievances filed under §

40.1-24.5-8

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 363, § 1.

40.1-24.5-10.
Dismissal from community residence.

A resident shall be fully informed, in writing, of the grounds for dismissal from the community residence. In the event that a resident is aggrieved by a dismissal, the resident shall have absolute recourse to the resident grievance procedure as outlined in §

40.1-24.5-8

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 363, § 1.

40.1-24.5-11.
Confidentiality of information and records.

The fact of admission and all information and records compiled, obtained, or maintained in the course of providing services to persons under this chapter shall be confidential.

Except as provided in subsections (c) and (d), the fact of admission and all confidential information and records shall not be released without the written consent of the resident concerned.

No consent for release of confidential information and records is required in the following situations:

To proper medical or psychiatric authorities for the purpose of providing emergency medical or psychiatric treatment when the resident’s life or health is in immediate jeopardy.

Between or among residence staff within the same community residence for purposes of coordinating services for a resident.

For program evaluation and/or research, provided that the director of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals adopts rules ensuring the anonymity of the resident’s identity. The rules shall include, but need not be limited to, the requirement that all evaluators and researchers must sign an oath of confidentiality, agreeing not to divulge, publish, or otherwise make known to unauthorized persons or the public any information obtained in the course of the evaluation or research regarding residents who have received services such that the resident who received the services is identifiable.

Pursuant to an order of a court of competent jurisdiction.

If a resident is deceased, consent for release of information deemed confidential under this section may be obtained from his or her personal representative, or in the absence of a personal representative, his or her surviving spouse. If there is neither a personal representative nor surviving spouse, consent may be obtained from the resident’s kindred of the closest degree; if there is more than one person of lawful age within the same degree of kindred, each shall individually possess the right to provide consent.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 363, § 1.

40.1-24.5-12.
Duties of the mental health advocate.

The mental health advocate shall perform the following duties:

Review periodically the procedures established by community residences to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

Review grievances of residents filed according to the provisions of the resident grievance procedure delineated in §

40.1-24.5-8

of this chapter in order to ensure that grievances have been fairly resolved in a timely fashion.

Investigate and report to the director of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals and/or the director of the community residence any occurrences, conditions, or practices with respect to procedure, personnel, or policy that reflect inadequacies with reference to provisions of this chapter.

Assist any resident to obtain needed assistance concerning problems not related to the provisions of this chapter by referring residents to appropriate lawyer-referral services, public or private, depending upon the resident’s ability to pay, and assist the residents in the preparation and transmission of correspondence, forms, and other communications.

To take action as he or she deems appropriate to protect the rights of residents including, but not limited to, programs of public education, legislative advocacy, and formal legal action.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 363, § 1.

40.1-24.5-13.
Access to information.

The mental health advocate shall have access to the following information:

The names of all persons in community residences, and the date admission began, unless the resident concerned specifically objects, in writing, to the access at the time of admission.

All current records and files maintained by the community residence, pertaining to individualized service plans and notices of denials or limitations of qualified rights defined in §

40.1-24.5-6

, provided that the resident concerned gives written permission for the access.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 363, § 1.

40.1-24.5-14.
Rights and powers of the mental health advocate.

In addition to any other rights and powers conferred upon him or her by law, the mental health advocate shall have the following rights and powers:

To communicate privately by mail or orally with any resident.

To inspect all records relating to residents, provided that the resident concerned gives written permission for inspection.

To take whatever steps are appropriate to see that persons are made aware of the services of the mental health advocate’s office, its purpose, and how it can be contacted. The director and staff of each community residence shall cooperate with the mental health advocate in this respect.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 363, § 1.

40.1-24.5-15.
Willful deprivation of resident’s rights.

Any person who willfully withholds from or denies to any person admitted to a community residence any of his or her rights as granted in this chapter shall, on conviction thereof, be fined not exceeding two thousand dollars ($2,000) or imprisoned not exceeding two (2) years, or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 363, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 141.

40.1-24.5-16.
Immunity from liability as to reports under chapter.

Any person who makes a report pursuant to this chapter, or who testifies in any administrative or judicial proceeding arising from the report, shall be immune from any civil or criminal liability for making the report or for testifying except for liability for perjury, unless the person acted in bad faith or with malicious purpose.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 363, § 1.

40.1-24.5-17.
Disqualification from position in community residence.

A person convicted of any crime under this chapter shall be disqualified from holding any position in any community residence licensed by the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals pursuant to chapter 24 of this title.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 363, § 1.

40.1-24.5-18.
Severability.

If any clause, sentence, paragraph, section, or part of this chapter shall be adjudged by any court of competent jurisdiction to be invalid, the judgment shall not affect, impair, or invalidate the remainder of the chapter, but shall be confined in its operation to the clause, sentence, paragraph, section, or part thereof directly involved in the controversy in which the judgment shall be rendered.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 363, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 141.

40.1-24.5-19.
Funds for implementation of chapter.

Any sums necessary for the implementation of this chapter shall be provided from the funds appropriated to the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals in fiscal year 1982-1983. It is expressly understood that additional funds for the implementation of this chapter are not provided.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 363, § 1.